en: Futon Dryers
xx: Futon Dryers
cs: Ohřívače futonových matrací
da: Futontørreapparat
de: Futontrockner
es: Secadores de futones
fr: Séchoirs pour futons
it: Asciugatori futon
ja: 布団乾燥機
nl: Futondrogers
no: Futon-tørkere
pl: Suszarki do futonów
pt: Secadores de futons
ru: Машины для сушки футона
sv: Futontorkare
tr: Futon Kurutucular

en: Garage Door Keypads & Remotes
xx: Garage Door Keypads & Remotes
cs: Tlačítkové a dálkové ovládání garážových vrat
da: Fjernbetjeninger til garageporte
de: Garagentoröffner
es: Mandos a distancia para puertas de garaje
fr: Pavés numériques et télécommandes pour portes de garage
it: Telecomandi e tastierini per portoni da garage
ja: ガレージシャッター用テンキースイッチ・リモコン
nl: Toetsenpanelen en afstandsbedieningen voor garagedeuren
no: Fjernkontroller og tastatur til garasjedører
pl: Piloty i klawiatury do bram garażowych
pt: Controles remotos para porta de garagem
ru: Пульты и брелоки для управления гаражными дверями
sv: Fjärrkontroller till garagedörrar
tr: Garaj Kapısı Tuş Takımları ve Uzaktan Kumandaları

en: Garage Door Openers
xx: Garage Door Openers
cs: Otvírače garážových vrat
da: Garageportsåbner
de: Garagentorantrieb
es: Sistemas de apertura para puertas de garaje
fr: Systèmes d'ouverture pour portes de garage
it: Aperture porte garage
ja: ガレージシャッター開閉装置
nl: Garagedeuropeners
no: Garasjedøråpnere
pl: Systemy napędowe do bram garażowych
pt: Abridores de porta de garagem
ru: Системы дистанционного открытия дверей гаража
sv: Garagedörröppnare
tr: Garaj Kapısı Açıcılar

en: Laundry Appliances
xx: Laundry Appliances
cs: Prací zařízení
da: Vasketøjsmaskiner
de: Waschen & Trocknen
es: Electrodomésticos para cuidado de la ropa
fr: Appareils de blanchisserie
it: Dispositivi lavanderia
ja: ランドリー家電
nl: Wasmachines
no: Klesvask-apparater
pl: Urządzenia do prania
pt: Eletrodomésticos para lavanderia
ru: Устройства для стирки
sv: Maskiner för tvätt och strykning
tr: Çamaşırhane Makineleri

en: Dryers
xx: Dryers
cs: Sušičky
da: Tørretumblere
de: Wäschetrockner
es: Secadoras
fr: Sèche-linge
it: Asciugatori indumenti
ja: 乾燥機
nl: Wasdrogers
no: Tørketromler
pl: Suszarki
pt: Secadoras de roupa
ru: Сушильные машины
sv: Torktumlare
tr: Kurutma Makineleri

en: Garment Steamers
xx: Garment Steamers
cs: Parní žehličky
da: Tøjdampere
de: Dampfglätter für Bekleidung
es: Vaporizadores para ropa
fr: Défroisseurs à vapeur
it: Stiratrici a vapore
ja: ガーメントスチーマー
nl: Kledingstomers
no: Kles-dampapparater
pl: Żelazka parowe
pt: Vaporizador de roupas
ru: Пароочистители для одежды
sv: Apparater för ångning av kläder
tr: Buharlı Elbise Temizleyiciler

en: Irons & Ironing Systems
xx: Irons & Ironing Systems
cs: Žehličky a žehlicí systémy
da: Strygejern
de: Bügeleisen & -systeme
es: Planchas y sistemas de planchado
fr: Fers à repasser et systèmes de repassage, Centrale vapeur, Centrales vapeur, Fer à repasser
it: Ferri e sistemi da stiro
ja: アイロン
nl: Strijkijzers en strijksystemen
no: Strykejern og strykesystemer
pl: Żelazka i systemy do prasowania
pt: Ferros e sistemas de passar roupa
ru: Утюги и гладильные системы
sv: Strykjärn
tr: Ütüler ve Ütüleme Sistemleri

en: Laundry Combo Units
xx: Laundry Combo Units
cs: Pračky se sušičkou
da: Vaskesøjler
de: Waschtrockner
es: Unidades lavadora-secadora
fr: Machines à laver séchantes
it: Lavatrici combo
ja: 洗濯乾燥機
nl: Was-droogcombinaties
no: Kombinerte vaskemaskiner/tørketromler
pl: Urządzenia piorące kombo
pt: Unidades combinadas para lavanderia
ru: Стирально-сушильные машины
sv: Kombinationsenheter för tvätt
tr: Çamaşırhane Kombine Üniteleri

en: Steam Presses
xx: Steam Presses
cs: Parní žehlicí lisy
da: Damppresser
de: Dampfpressen
es: Prensas de vapor
fr: Presses à repasser
it: Presse a vapore
ja: スチームアイロン
nl: Stoompersmachines
no: Damppresser
pl: Prasowalnice
pt: Prensas à vapor
ru: Паровые гладильные прессы
sv: Ångpressar
tr: Buharlı Presler

en: Washing Machines
xx: Washing Machines
cs: Pračky
da: Vaskemaskiner
de: Waschmaschinen
es: Lavadoras
fr: Lave-linge, Machine à laver
it: Lavatrici
ja: 洗濯機
nl: Wasapparatuur
no: Vaskemaskiner
pl: Pralki
pt: Lavadoras de roupas
ru: Стиральные машины
sv: Tvättmaskiner
tr: Çamaşır Makineleri

en: Front-loading Washing Machines
fr: Lave-linge à chargement frontal, lave-linge hublot

en: Top-loading Washing Machines
fr: Lave-linge à chargement par le haut, lave-linge top

en: Ultrasonic Cleaners
xx: Ultrasonic Cleaners
cs: Ultrazvukové čističky
da: Rengøringsapparater med ultralyd
de: Ultraschallreiniger
es: Aparatos de limpieza por ultrasonidos
fr: Nettoyeurs à ultrasons
it: Strumenti di pulizia a ultrasuoni
ja: 超音波洗浄器
nl: Ultrasone reinigers
no: Ultralydrensing
pl: Urządzenia czyszczące ultradźwiękami
pt: Limpadores ultrassônicos
ru: Ультразвуковые очистители
sv: Ultraljudstvätt
tr: Yüksek Frekanslı Temizleyiciler

en: Vacuums, Vacuum cleaner
xx: Vacuums
cs: Vysavače
da: Støvsuger, Støvsugere, Vand- og støvsugere
de: Staubsauger
es: Aspiradoras
fr: Aspirateurs, Aspirateur, Mini-aspirateur
it: Aspirapolvere
ja: 掃除機
nl: Stofzuigers
no: Støvsugere
pl: Odkurzacze
pt: Aspiradores de pó
ru: Пылесосы
sv: Dammsugare
tr: Elektrik Süpürgeleri

en: Corded Vacuums
fr: Aspirateur filaire

en: Cordless vacuums
fr: Aspirateur non filaire

en: Wallpaper Steamers
xx: Wallpaper Steamers
cs: Napařovače na tapety
da: Tapetdampere
de: Dampf-Tapetenlöser
es: Vaporizadores para papel pintado
fr: Décolleuses à papier peint
it: Sverniciatore a vapore per carta da parati
ja: 壁紙用スチーマー
nl: Behangafstomers
no: Tapetdampere
pl: Parowe odklejacze do tapet
pt: Ferros para papel de parede
ru: Паровые стрипперы обоев
sv: Tapetångare
tr: Buharlı Duvar Kağıdı Sökme Makineleri

en: Water Heaters
xx: Water Heaters
cs: Ohřívače vody\, bojlery
da: Vandvarmere
de: Heißwasserboiler
es: Calentadores de agua
fr: Chauffe-eau
it: Riscaldatori acqua
ja: 湯沸器・給湯器
nl: Boilers
no: Varmtvannsberedere
pl: Podgrzewacze wody
pt: Aquecedores de água
ru: Водонагреватели
sv: Varmvattenberedare
tr: Termosifonlar

en: Household Supplies
xx: Household Supplies
cs: Potřeby pro domácnosti
da: Husholdningsartikler
de: Haushaltsbedarf
es: Productos del hogar
fr: Produits ménagers
it: Forniture domestiche
ja: 日用品
nl: Huishoudelijke benodigdheden
no: Husholdningsprodukter
pl: Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego
pt: Suprimentos domésticos
ru: Хозяйственные товары
sv: Hushållsutrustning
tr: Ev Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Drawer & Shelf Liners
xx: Drawer & Shelf Liners
cs: Podložky do zásuvek a na police
da: Hyldepapir
de: Auskleidung für Schubladen & Regale
es: Forros para cajones y estanterías
fr: Revêtements pour tiroirs et étagères
it: Rivestimenti per cassetti e scaffali
ja: 引き出し・棚用シート
nl: Kastpapier
no: Innlegg til skuffer og hyller
pl: Materiały do wykładania szuflad i półek
pt: Forros para prateleiras e gavetas
ru: Подкладки для ящиков и шкафов
sv: Låd- och hyllpapper och -plast
tr: Çekmece ve Raf Kaplamaları